District of Columbia statutes.
46-509

Applicability.

This chapter applies to any premarital agreement executed on or after February 9, 1996.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 10, 42 DCR 6770
1981 Ed., § 30-149.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 12 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.